Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8224
Patient care protocols, defined.

Patient care protocols means the written procedures adopted by the medical staff of a trauma center, specialty level burn or pediatric trauma center, or rehabilitation center that direct the care of the patient, based upon the assessment of the patient's medical needs. Patient care protocols shall follow minimum statewide standards for trauma care services.

Laws 1997, LB 626, § 24.